Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5547.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 14p. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 482 to 499 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 482.44 Property H Bills of lading â issuance for goods not received 5 482.46 Property H Bills of lading â issuance of duplicate negotiable bill with intent to defraud 5 482.48 Property H Bills of lading â negotiation when goods not in carriers' possession 5 482.49 Property H Bills of lading â inducing carrier to issue when goods have not been received 5 482.50 Property H Bills of lading â issuance of non-negotiable bill not so marked 5 487.1042(1) Pub trst E Money transmission services act â intentionally making a false statement, misrepresentation, or certification in a record or document 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 487.1042(2) Pub trst E Criminal fraud in the conduct of money transmission services business 5 487.1042(3) Pub trst E Money transmission services act license violation 5 487.1505(6) Pub trst E BIDCO act â knowingly receiving money or property at an interest rate exceeding 25% 5 487.2281(1) Pub trst E Money transmission modernization act â intentionally making a false statement, misrepresentation, or certification in a record or document 5 487.2281(2) Pub trst E Criminal fraud in the conduct of money transmission business 5 487.2281(3) Pub trst E Money transmission modernization act license violation 5 492.137(a) Pub trst H Installment sales of motor vehicles 3 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 493.56a(13) Pub trst C False statement in reports â secondary mortgage 15 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January 1, 2026. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5544 (request no. H02309'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.